Washington statutes.
RCW 39.98.900

Contingent effective date—1999 c 273.

This act takes effect January 1, 2000, if the proposed amendment to Article VIII, section 1 of the state Constitution, guaranteeing the general obligation debt of school districts, is validly submitted to and is approved and ratified by the voters at the next general election. If the proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, this act is void in its entirety.

[ 1999 c 273 s 10.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: 1999 Senate Joint Resolution No. 8206 was approved at the November 1999 general election. See Article VIII, section 1 and Amendment 78 of the state Constitution.